Maryland, session 2025, SB0884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–815.
(e) (1) In addition to the requirements contained in subsections (a), (b), and (c)
of this section, an operator must obtain State–issued endorsements of an operator’s
commercial driver’s license to operate commercial motor vehicles which are:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0884*

SENATE BILL 884
(i) Double/triple trailers;
(ii) Vehicles designed to transport 16 or more passengers including
the driver (passenger vehicles);
(iii) School buses; or
(iv) Tank vehicles.
(2) A school bus endorsement authorized under this subsection is also an
endorsement for vehicles designed to transport 16 or more passengers including the driver
(passenger vehicles).
16–817.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) [and], (c), AND (D) of this section, the
Administration may not issue a commercial driver’s license or a commercial driver’s
instructional permit to any individual:
(1) Who is not a resident of Maryland; and
(2) Who is not at least 21 years of age.
(b) The Administration may issue a Class A, B, or C commercial driver’s license
or a commercial driver’s instructional permit to an individual under the age of 21, if the
individual is at least 18 years of age. The license:
(1) May not include a hazardous materials endorsement;
(2) May not be valid for commercial interstate operation except as
permitted by 49 C.F.R. Parts 390 to 399; and
(3) Shall be valid for commercial intrastate and all noncommercial
operation.
(c) Consistent with the Code of Federal Regulations, the Administration may
issue a commercial driver’s license to an applicant domiciled in a foreign country.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ISSUE A CLASS B COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S
LICENSE WITH ADDITIONAL STATE–ISSUED ENDORSEMENTS TO OPERATE SCHOOL
BUSES OR PASSENGER VEHICLES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS NOT A RESIDENT OF MARYLAND; AND

SENATE BILL 884 3
(2) HOLDS THE EQUIVALENT OF A CLASS B COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S
LICENSE, AND THE APPROPRIATE EQUIVALENT ENDORSEMENTS, FROM THE
DRIVER’S LICENSING AUTHORITY OF A NEIGHBORING STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.